New York, session 2025-2026, S1779.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 131-sss to read as follows: 3 § 131-sss. Public benefit card replacement. 1. Definitions. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "Commissioner" shall mean the commissioner of the office of tempo- 7 rary and disability assistance. 8 (b) "Office" or "OTDA" shall mean the office of temporary and disabil- 9 ity assistance. 10 (c) "EBT card" shall mean an electronic benefit transfer card issued 11 for access to benefits provided pursuant to this chapter. 12 2. Within one year of the effective date of this section, the commis- 13 sioner shall develop and implement a program to replace all EBT cards 14 issued in the state which utilize magnetic strips with cards that 15 utilize chip technology. The office shall coordinate with all commis- 16 sioners of social services and EBT card issuers within the state to 17 implement such card replacement program. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05053-01-5